Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-106 Optional provisions. Except
as provided in section 431:10A-107, no policy of accident and health or
sickness insurance delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State
shall contain the provisions set forth below unless the provisions are in the
words in which they appear below; provided that the insurer may substitute
corresponding provisions of different wording certified by an officer of the
insurer to be in substantial conformance with the wording below that are in
each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the
beneficiary. The provisions listed in this section are optional provisions.
Any of the following provisions contained in the policy shall be preceded
individually by the specified caption or, at the option of the insurer, by
appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions substantially similar
to the specified caption. The provisions are as follows:

(1) "Change of Occupation: If the insured is
injured or contracts sickness after having changed occupations to one
classified by the insurer as more hazardous than that stated in this policy or
while doing for compensation anything pertaining to an occupation so
classified, the insurer will pay only the portion of the indemnities provided in
this policy that the premium paid would have purchased at the rates and within
the limits fixed by the insurer for the more hazardous occupation. If the
insured's occupation changes to one classified by the insurer as less hazardous
than that stated in this policy, the insurer, upon receipt of proof of the
change of occupation, will reduce the premium rate accordingly, and will return
the excess pro rata unearned premium from the date of change of occupation or
from the policy anniversary date immediately preceding receipt of such proof,
whichever is more recent. In applying this provision, the classification of
occupational risk and the premium shall be those as have been last filed by the
insurer prior to the occurrence of the loss for which the insurer is liable or
prior to date of proof of change in occupation with the state official having
supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided at the time
this policy was issued; but if a filing was not required, then the
classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those last
made effective by the insurer in the state where the insured resided prior to
the occurrence of the loss or prior to the date of proof of change in
occupation";

(2) "Misstatement of Age: If the age of the
insured has been misstated, all amounts payable under this policy shall be such
as the premium paid would have purchased at the insured's correct age";

(3) Other insurance in this insurer shall be in one
of the following forms:

(A) "Other Insurance in This Insurer:
If an accident and health or sickness policy or policies previously issued by
the insurer to the insured concurrently in force, making the aggregate
indemnity for (insert type of coverage or coverages) in excess of $ (insert
maximum limit of indemnity or indemnities) the excess insurance shall be void
and all premiums paid for the excess shall be returned to the insured or to the
insured's estate"; or

(B) "Other Insurance in This Insurer:
Insurance effective at any one time on the insured under a like policy or
policies in this insurer is limited to the one policy elected by the insured,
the insured's beneficiary, or the insured's estate, as the case may be, and the
insurer shall return all premiums paid for all other policies";

(4) Insurance with other insurers. Either or both of
the following forms shall be used:

(A) (i) "Insurance with Other Insurers: If
there be other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for
the same loss on a provision of service basis or on an expense incurred basis
and of which this insurer has not been given written notice prior to the
occurrence or commencement of loss, the only liability under any expense
incurred coverage of this policy shall be for the proportion of the loss that would
otherwise have been payable plus the total of the like amounts under all the
other valid coverages for the same loss of which this insurer had notice bears
to the total like amounts under all valid coverages for the loss, and for the
return of the portion of the premiums paid as shall exceed the pro rata portion
for the amount so determined. For the purpose of applying this provision when
other coverage is on a provision of service basis, the like amount of other
coverage shall be taken as the amount which the services rendered would have
cost in the absence of the other coverage"; and

(ii) "Insurance with Other Insurers: If
there be other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for
the same loss on other than an expense incurred basis and of which this insurer
has not been given written notice prior to the occurrence or commencement of
loss, the only liability for benefits under this policy shall be for the
proportion of the indemnities otherwise provided hereunder for a loss as the
like indemnities of which the insurer had notice (including the indemnities
under this policy) bear to the total amount of all the indemnities for the
loss, and for the return of the portion of the premium paid as shall exceed the
pro rata portion for the indemnities thus determined";

(B) If the provision set forth in
subparagraph (A)(i) is included in a policy that also contains the provision
set forth in subparagraph (A)(ii), there shall be added to the caption of the
subparagraph (A)(i) provision the phrase, "expense incurred
benefits";

(C) The insurer may, at its option, include
in the provision set forth in subparagraph (A)(i) a definition of other valid
coverage, approved as to form by the commissioner, which shall be limited in
subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by
insurance law or by insurance authorities of this State or any other state or
territory of the United States or any province of Canada, and by hospital or
medical service organizations, and to any other coverage the inclusion of which
may be approved by the commissioner. In the absence of a definition the term
shall not include group insurance, automobile medical payment insurance, or
coverage provided by hospital or medical service organizations, union welfare
plans, or employer or employee benefit organizations. For the purpose of
applying the provision set forth in subparagraph (A)(i) with respect to any
insured, any amount of benefit provided for an insured pursuant to any
compulsory benefit statute (including any workers' compensation or employers'
liability statute), whether provided by a governmental agency or otherwise,
shall in all cases be deemed to be other valid coverage of which the insurer
has had notice. In applying the provision set forth in subparagraph (A)(i), no
third party liability coverage shall be included as other valid coverage;

(D) If the provision set forth in
subparagraph (A)(ii) is included in a policy that also contains the provision
set forth in subparagraph (A)(i), there shall be added to the caption of the
subparagraph (A)(ii) provision the phrase, "other benefits"; and

(E) The insurer may, at its option, include
in the provision set forth in subparagraph (A)(ii) a definition of other valid
coverage, approved as to form by the commissioner, which shall be limited in
subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by
insurance law or by insurance authorities of this State or any other state or
territory of the United States or any province of Canada, and to any other
coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the commissioner. In the
absence of a definition the term shall not include group insurance, or benefits
provided by union welfare plans or employer or employee benefit organizations.
For the purpose of applying the provision set forth in subparagraph (A)(ii)
with respect to any insured, any amount of benefit provided for an insured
pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute including any workers' compensation
or employers' liability statute, whether provided by a governmental agency or
otherwise, shall in all cases be deemed to be other valid coverage of which the
insurer has had notice. In applying the provision set forth in subparagraph
(A)(ii), no third party liability coverage shall be included as other valid
coverage;

(5) (A) "Relation of Earnings to Insurance:
If the total monthly amount of loss of time benefits promised for the same loss
under all valid loss of time coverage upon the insured, whether payable on a weekly
or monthly basis, exceeds the monthly earnings of the insured at the time
disability commenced or the insured's average monthly earnings for the period
of two years immediately preceding a disability for which claim is made,
whichever is greater, the insurer shall be liable only for the proportionate
amount of benefits under this policy as the amount of the monthly earnings or
average monthly earnings of the insured bears to the total amount of monthly
benefits for the same loss under all coverage upon the insured at the time disability
commences and for the return of the part of the premiums paid during the two
preceding years as shall exceed the pro rata amount of the premiums for the
benefits actually paid hereunder; but this shall not operate to reduce the
total monthly amount of benefits payable under all coverage upon the insured
below the sum of $200 or the sum of the monthly benefits specified in the
coverages, whichever is the lesser, nor shall it operate to reduce benefits
other than those payable for loss of time";

(B) The policy provision in subparagraph (A)
may be inserted only in a policy which the insured has the right to continue in
force, subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums until at least
age fifty or, in the case of a policy issued after age forty-four, for at least
five years from its date of issue; and

(C) The insurer may, at its option, include
in the provision set forth in subparagraph (A) a definition of valid loss of
time coverage approved as to form by the commissioner, which shall be limited
in subject matter to coverage provided by governmental agencies or by
organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance
authorities of this State or any state, district, or territory of the United States
or any province of Canada, or to any other coverage the inclusion of which may
be approved by the commissioner or any combination of approved coverages. In
the absence of a definition the terms shall not include any coverage provided
for an insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute including any
workers' compensation or employers' liability statute, or benefits provided by
union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations;

(6) "Unpaid Premium: Upon the payment of a
claim under this policy, any premium then due and unpaid or covered by any note
or written order may be deducted from the claim";

(7) "Cancellation: The insurer may cancel this
policy at any time by written notice delivered to the insured, or mailed to the
insured's last address as shown by the records of the insurer. The notice
shall state when, not less than five days thereafter, the cancellation shall be
effective. After the policy has been continued beyond its original term the
insured may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered or
mailed to the insurer, effective upon receipt or on a later date specified in the
notice. In the event of cancellation, the insurer shall return promptly the
unearned portion of any premium paid. If the insured cancels, the earned
premium shall be computed by the use of the short-rate table last filed with
the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the
insured resided when the policy was issued. If the insurer cancels, the earned
premium shall be computed pro rata. Cancellation shall be without prejudice to
any claim originating prior to the effective date of cancellation";

(8) "Conformity with State Statutes: Any
provision of this policy which, on its effective date, is in conflict with the
statutes of the state in which the insured resides on the effective date is
hereby amended to conform to the minimum requirements of the applicable
statutes";

(9) "Illegal Occupation: The insurer shall not
be liable for any loss to which a contributing cause was the insured's
commission of or attempt to commit a felony or to which a contributing cause
was the insured's being engaged in an illegal occupation"; and

(10) "Intoxicants and Narcotics: The insurer
shall not be liable for any loss sustained or contracted in consequence of the
insured's being intoxicated or under the influence of any narcotic unless
administered on the advice of a physician." [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2002, c 155, §53; am L 2004, c 122, §32; am L 2010, c 116, §1(16)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next